pt-PT: Tecnologia do visor da câmara: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Outro
en: Camera display technology: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Other
hr-HR: Tehnologija zaslona fotoaparata: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Ostalo
sl-SI: Tehnologija zaslona fotoaparata: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Drugo
sv: Kameradisplayteknik: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Övrigt
fi: Kameran näyttöteknologia: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Muu
vi: Công nghệ màn hình hiển thị: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Khác
de: Bildschirmtechnologie der Kamera: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Sonstiges
pl: Technologia wyświetlania aparatu: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Inne
fr: Technologie d’affichage d’appareil photo: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Autre
bg-BG: Технология на дисплея на камерата: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Други
nb: Kameravisningsteknologi: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Annet
nl: Cameraschermtechnologie: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Andere
ja: カメラディスプレイの技術: AMOLED; LCD; 有機EL; Super AMOLED; TFT; その他
zh-CN: 相机显示技术: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; 超级 AMOLED; TFT; 其他
hu: Kamerakijelző technológiája: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Egyéb
es: Tecnología de pantalla de cámara: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Súper AMOLED; TFT; Otros
it: Tecnologia del display della fotocamera: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; SuperAMOLED; TFT; Altro
th: เทคโนโลยีของจอแสดงผลกล้อง: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; อื่นๆ
tr: Kamera görüntüleme teknolojisi: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Süper AMOLED; TFT; Diğer
el: Τεχνολογία απεικόνισης κάμερας: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Άλλο
cs: Zobrazovací technologie kamery: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Jiné
ru: Технология экрана камеры: AMOLED; ЖК-ДИСПЛЕЙ; OLED; Супер AMOLED; TFT; Другое
pt-BR: Tecnologia de exibição da câmera: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Outro
sk-SK: Technológia obrazovky fotoaparátu: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Iné
lt-LT: Fotoaparato ekrano technologija: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Kita
ro-RO: Tehnologie afișaj aparat foto: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Altele
da: Kameraskærmteknologi: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; Super AMOLED; TFT; Andet
zh-TW: 相機顯示技術: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; 超級 AMOLED; TFT; 其他
ko: 카메라 디스플레이 기술: AMOLED; LCD; OLED; 슈퍼 AMOLED; TFT; 기타